California, session 20252026, AB1666.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) California is currently facing a wood waste crisis, whereby tens of millions of tons of forest biomass from wildfire prevention, wildfire recovery, and agricultural biomass from crops, orchards, and vineyards are being piled and burned or left to decay in place every year, causing significant carbon and air pollution.(b) Existing state policy, including the “2022 Climate Change Scoping Plan for Achieving Carbon Neutrality” adopted by the State Air Resources Board, identifies the need to collect and convert these residues into carbon-beneficial end uses, including low-carbon fuels, including biomethane, sustainable aviation fuel, and hydrogen, wood products, including mass timber, and carbon dioxide removal.(c) Existing state policy, Resolution 22-21 “2022 Climate Change Scoping Plan for Achieving Carbon Neutrality,” adopted December 15, 2022, by the State Air Resources Board, provides that the state board has determined that the “expansion of biomass combustion for energy production should not be pursued and opportunities for noncombustion biomass solutions should be prioritized.”SEC. 2. Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 4820) is added to Part 2.5 of Division 4 of the Public Resources Code, to read: CHAPTER 7. Biomass Innovation Parks4820. This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the Biomass Innovation Parks Act.4821. For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:(a) “Agency” means the Natural Resources Agency.(b) “Agricultural biomass residues” means crop, orchard, vineyard, or other agricultural residues, and excludes dairy manure and crops grown for the primary purpose of producing energy.(c) “Biomass program” means the Biomass Innovation Park Grants and Financing Program established pursuant to Section 4829.(d) “Board” means the State Board of Forestry and Fire Protection.(e)“CAL-FIRE” means the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection.(f)(e) “California Native American tribe” has the same meaning as in Section 21073.(g)(f) “Clean hydrogen” means hydrogen derived from a production facility and associated onsite storage and processing facilities that is solely derived from biomass feedstock and/or or renewable energy sources covered under the California Renewables Portfolio Standard Program pursuant to Article 16 (commencing with Section 399.11) of Chapter 2.3 of Part 1 of Division 1 of the Public Utilities Code.(h)(g) “Commission” means the California Building Standards Commission.(i)(h) “Council” means the Strategic Growth Council.(j)“Department” means the Department of Food and Agriculture.(k)(i) “Eligible applicant” includes, but is not limited to, state or local agencies, California Native American tribes, nongovernmental organizations, joint powers authorities, or special districts.(l)(j) “Forest biomass residues” means material removed for wildfire mitigation, forest restoration projects, or the protection of public safety and infrastructure. “Forest biomass residues” does not include trees grown for the primary purpose of producing energy.(m)(k) “Office” means the Office of Land Use and Climate 40 Innovation.(n)(l) “Park” means a biomass innovation park identified by the agency pursuant to Section 4822.(o)(m) “Wood waste” means forest biomass residues or agricultural biomass residues.4822. (a) The agency, on or before September 30, 2027, in coordination with the department Department of Food and Agriculture and CAL-FIRE, the department, shall identify one or more parks pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c).(b) The agency, in coordination with the department Department of Food and Agriculture and CAL-FIRE, the department, shall develop guidelines and facilitate a planning process for purposes of identifying parks pursuant to subdivision (a) and guidelines for purposes of soliciting proposals from eligible applicants to develop, operate, and manage a park. The guidelines shall include all of the following requirements:(1) Each park shall only process wood waste that originated in California.(2) (A) Each park shall only host projects that use a noncombustion technology to convert wood waste into carbon-beneficial products or end uses, including, but not limited to, wood products produced by small-diameter sawmills, biomethane, clean hydrogen, and carbon dioxide removal determined to be appropriate by the State Air Resources Board.(B) This paragraph does not prohibit the use of ancillary systems that support a noncombustion technology, including, but not limited to, the provision of process heat for the manufacture of wood products.(3) Each park shall require compliance with the applicable regional air quality management district or air pollution control district regulations in order to minimize air pollution.(4) Each park shall establish a community benefits program.(5) Evaluation criteria that provides a preference for projects that are developed by, or in partnership with, a California Native American tribe.(c) In order to facilitate a planning process for identifying parks, the agency, in coordination with the department Department of Food and Agriculture and CAL-FIRE, the department, may develop guidance on all of the following:(1) The relevant state and local permitting agencies that would need to provide the requisite permits in order to cite site and develop a park.(2) Guidance for a public agency and private industry to partner on a park proposal.(3) Pathways for marketing park-generated products or end uses, including, but not limited to, in-state feedstock buyers for biomethane and clean hydrogen.(d) (1) The agency may establish additional requirements that are related to the planning and solicitation process described in subdivision (b) at its discretion.(2) The agency’s guidelines developed pursuant to subdivision (b) shall allow existing facilities to submit a proposal to expand into a park in order to accept additional wood waste if the expansion complies with the requirements of subdivision (b).(3) The agency’s guidelines developed pursuant to subdivision (b) shall include a preference for projects that use mobile processing technologies.(e) The agency may perform additional activities to facilitate park identification and early-stage development, including, but not limited to, coordinating stakeholders, engaging communities, providing technical assistance, and reporting to the Legislature.4823. The agency, in coordination with the office and CAL-FIRE, the department, shall do all of the following:(a) Develop regional wood waste availability assessments.(b) Develop new, or support existing, public agencies to facilitate long-term forest biomass residues feedstock supply from federal government and nonindustrial private lands. This support may include, but is not limited to, technical assistance.(c) Adopt a tracking system to trace and authenticate forest biomass origins.4824. The board, in coordination with the Department of General Services, on or before September 30, 2027, shall develop a strategy to support the procurement of wood products, including, but not limited to, mass timber, for use in state-funded projects involving the construction or reconstruction of buildings. The strategy shall prioritize wood products that achieve low embodied greenhouse gas emissions.4825. The council and the Department of Housing and Community Development shall consider incorporating the use of wood products produced in California in housing grant programs and, if wood products produced in California are incorporated in housing grant programs, shall give preference to wood products produced in California by a California-based company.4826. The commission shall identify and adopt new measures that incentivize wood products produced in California.4827. The Biomass Innovation Park Grants and Financing Program is hereby established, to be administered by the agency, for purposes of this chapter.4828. (a) The agency shall deliver a report to the Legislature on or before December 31, 2027, containing information pertaining to the parks identified pursuant to Section 4822.(b) A report submitted to the Legislature pursuant to this section shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.